Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.028

Statement of prosecuting attorney provided to department, when.

It is the intent of the legislature to expedite the inmate classification process of the department of corrections. The statement of the prosecuting attorney regarding a convicted criminal defendant should be prepared and made available to the department at the time the convicted person is placed in the custody of the department.

[ 1984 c 114 s 1.]